Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1112
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) The state should anticipate and prepare for significant growth in the number of older Nebraskans and the future needs of persons with disabilities, both of which will require costly long-term care services;

(2) The state should improve access to existing services and support for persons with disabilities;

(3) The state should provide a streamlined approach to identify the needs of older Nebraskans and persons with disabilities through uniform assessments and a single point of contact; and

(4) Nebraskans would benefit from statewide public information campaigns to educate older Nebraskans, persons with disabilities, and their caregivers on the availability of services and support.

Laws 2015, LB320, § 2.